Louisiana, session 2026, HB726.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:2531.1(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2531.1. Gross littering prohibited; criminal penalties; indemnification
A.(1) No person shall intentionally dispose or permit the disposal of any
household or office furniture or appliances, automotive parts, including but not
limited to tires and engines, trailers, boats and boating accessories, tools and
equipment, building materials, roofing nails, and bags or boxes of household or
office garbage or refuse upon any public place in the state, upon private property in
this state not owned by him, upon property located in rural areas in this state not
owned by him, or in or on the waters of this state, whether from a vehicle or
otherwise, including but not limited to any public highway, public right-of-way,
public park, beach, campground, forest land, recreational area, trailer park, highway,
road, street, or alley, except when such property is designated by the state or by any
of its agencies or political subdivisions for the disposal of such items and such
person is authorized to use such property for such purpose.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 726 ENROLLED
(2) Any person who intentionally abandons a boat or other vessel shall be
subject to double the penalties provided for violations under this Section.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.